Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 70
GEOTHERMAL RESOURCES

34-70-101 to 34-70-110. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article repealed, p. 1424, § 5, effective June 10.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1974. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1983, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For provisions relating to geothermal resources, as adopted in 1983, see article 90.5 of title 37.